Maryland, session 2026, HB0469.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Real Property
11–114.3.
(A) (1) THIS SECTION APPLIES ONLY TO A CONDOMINIUM COMPOSED
ENTIRELY OF UNITS INTENDED FOR RESIDENTIAL USE.
(2) THIS SECTION DOES NOT APPLY TO DETACHED UNITS OF A
CONDOMINIUM.
(B) (1) A UNIT OWNER SHALL MAINTAIN A CONDOMINIUM UNIT OWNER
INSURANCE POLICY OR A SUBSTANTIALLY SIMILAR PROPERTY INSURANCE POLICY
ON THE UNIT.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb0469*

HOUSE BILL 469
(2) AN INSURANCE POLICY REQUIRED UNDER PARAGRAPH (1) OF
THIS SUBSECTION SHALL INCLUDE:
(I) COVERAGE FOR THE COUNCIL OF UNIT OWNERS’ PROPERTY
INSURANCE DEDUCTIBLE OR A PORTION OF THE DEDUCTIBLE REQUIRED UNDER §
11–114 OF THIS TITLE;
(II) A COVERAGE LIMIT THAT IS SUFFICIENT TO REPAIR OR
REPLACE THE UNIT OWNER’S PERSONAL PROPERTY OR THE CONTENTS OF THE UNIT;
(III) LOSS OF USE COVERAGE IN AN AMOUNT SUFFICIENT TO
PROVIDE ALTERNATE HOUSING FOR AT LEAST 12 MONTHS IF THE UNIT OWNER
CANNOT LIVE IN THE UNIT;
(IV) PERSONAL LIABILITY COVERAGE OF AT LEAST $500,000;
(V) LOSS ASSESSMENT COVERAGE OF AT LEAST $25,000; AND
(VI) DWELLING OR BUILDING PROPERTY COVERAGE OF AT
LEAST THE GREATER OF:
1. $25,000; OR
2. THE AMOUNT NECESSARY TO REPAIR AND REPLACE:
A. ALTERATIONS, ADDITIONS, BETTERMENTS, AND
INVESTMENTS MADE OR ACQUIRED BY THE CURRENT UNIT OWNER; AND
B. UPGRADES CONVEYED TO THE UNIT OWNER THAT
ARE THE RESPONSIBILITY OF THE UNIT OWNER TO INSURE UNDER THE BYLAWS OF
THE CONDOMINIUM.
(C) THE BYLAWS OF A CONDOMINIUM MAY REQUIRE A UNIT OWNER TO
MAINTAIN AN INSURANCE POLICY THAT INCLUDES COVERAGE AMOUNTS IN EXCESS
OF THE REQUIREMENTS UNDER SUBSECTION (B) OF THIS SECTION.
(D) EACH UNIT OWNER SHALL PROVIDE EVIDENCE OF THE INSURANCE
POLICY REQUIRED UNDER SUBSECTION (B) OF THIS SECTION TO THE COUNCIL OF
UNIT OWNERS:
(1) ANNUALLY; AND
(2) ON REQUEST BY THE COUNCIL OF UNIT OWNERS.

HOUSE BILL 469 3
(E) (1) IF A UNIT OWNER DOES NOT MAINTAIN AN INSURANCE POLICY AS
REQUIRED UNDER SUBSECTION (B) OF THIS SECTION, THE COUNCIL OF UNIT
OWNERS MAY ACQUIRE AN INSURANCE POLICY ON BEHALF OF THE UNIT OWNER.
(2) A COUNCIL OF UNIT OWNERS THAT ACQUIRES AN INSURANCE
POLICY ON BEHALF OF A UNIT OWNER UNDER PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS SUBSECTION
MAY CHARGE THE INSURANCE PREMIUM AS AN ASSESSMENT TO THE UNIT OWNER.
(3) FOR AN INSURANCE POLICY ACQUIRED ON BEHALF OF A UNIT
OWNER UNDER THIS SUBSECTION, THE INSURANCE CARRIER SHALL PAY DIRECTLY
TO THE COUNCIL OF UNIT OWNERS THE PORTION OF THE COUNCIL’S DEDUCTIBLE
THAT THE UNIT OWNER IS RESPONSIBLE FOR UNDER § 11–114 OF THIS TITLE.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026.